District of Columbia statutes.
33-434

Repealed

Dissolution — Power of partner to bind partnership; liability of partner.

Repealed.

Sept. 27, 1962, 76 Stat. 643, Pub. L. 87-709, § 35
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-234, § 1203, 44 DCR 777
1981 Ed., § 41-134.
1973 Ed., § 41-334.